dictionaries/da_DK/da_DK-2.5.024.dic
fallos/12,9
fatamorgana/12,6,13
favn/7,4,12,32
fedtstof/12,5
femtedel/7,4,12
fifle/3,22,23
finanslovsdebat/12,9,32
Finansrådet/11
fjernsynsprogram/12,5
fjerntog/6,12,7
flamme/12,13,4,32
flig/7,4,12
flimre/3,22,23
fok/12,9
forbjerg/6,12,7
fordybe/3,22,23
forgrund/7,4,12
forlem/12,5
forligsmandslov/7,4,12
formane/3,22,23
forsalg/12,46,6
forstene/3,22,23
forsøgsby/12,13,4
foras/12,5
fråde/3,22,23
fragter/7,4,12
fredsinitiativ/12,6,13
fredspolitik/12,9
Freja/11
fribytter/7,4,12
fritur/7,4,12
fuldautomatisere/3,22,23
fur/12,46,6
fæstningsby/12,13,4
fødselsvægt/7,4,12
gaf/12,9
game/12,46,6
gat/12,5,32
gendøber/7,4,12
generalisere/3,22,23
generatorbil/12,13,4
genopbygge/3,22,23
gesandtskab/12,6,13
gis/12,5
glaskarnap/12,9
glasrude/12,13,4
glastråd/7,4,12
gnubbe/3,22,23
gravminde/12,6,13
Griseldis/11
grønsagssaft/12,13,4
guerillakrig/7,4,12
gummifabrik/12,9
gyrokompas/12,5
gø/3,22,23
Habakuk/11
hagl/12,46,6,32
håndbold/7,4,12,32
handelscentrene/12,5
hardtop/12,9
harmoniers/12,5
headhunter/7,4,12
helaftensforestilling/12,13,4
Helene/11
henlede/3,22,23
Herzegovina/11
himmellegeme/12,6,13
histogram/12,5
hjælper/7,4,12
Holsten/54,11
holstener/7,4,12
hoplit/12,9
husvale/3,22,23
hvidløgspresser/7,4,12
højfjeldshotel/12,5
højniveaufag/12,46,6
ibis/12,9
Iceberg/11
ildtorn/7,4,12
imitere/3,22,23
indfarvning/12,13,4
indsæbe/3,22,23
intimmassageklinik/12,9
ishav/6,12,7
Izvestia/11
Jena/11
joggingstof/12,5
jordbakterie/12,13,4
jordpolitik/12,9
Josias/11
junker/7,4,12
Jørgen/11
kaktusserne/12,9
kanariegræs/12,5
kapel/12,9,32
karakterisere/3,22,23
karbonat/12,6,13
kebab/12,9
keyboardspiller/7,4,12
kirsebærbrændevin/7,4,12
knap/12,9,32
Knudshoved/11
kobberbryllup/12,5
kommando/12,6,13
kommatere/3,22,23
kontinuets/12,5
kontis/12,13,4
kostumebal/12,5
kotelet/12,9,32
krigsfangelejr/7,4,12
Krist/11
kryds/12,6,13
kuldsejle/3,22,23
kvantumrabat/12,9
kværkning/12,13,4
kører/7,4,12
laf/12,5
landhus/6,12,7
Laurentius/11
levnedsmiddelkontrol/12,9
lidse/12,13,4
lighedsprincip/12,5
Ligurien/11
lindorm/7,4,12
livsmål/12,46,6
logge/3,22,23
Lovtidende/11
lækkerbid/12,9
lærebogsstof/12,5
løvsavsarbejde/12,6,13
madlaver/7,4,12
madrigal/12,13,4
Magdeburg/11
Mariager/11
medicinalfabrik/12,9
mellemdistanceløber/7,4,12
Mellemitalien/11
mellemstykke/12,6,13
menneskehjerne/12,13,4,32
menstruere/3,22,23
metal/12,5,32
Midas/11
mnemoteknik/12,9
monstrum/12,5
morgenmåltid/12,6,13
Multimax/11
munddel/7,4,12
myggesværm/7,4,12
naturfilosof/12,9
nederlag/12,46,6
Nederlandene/54,11
nedhale/3,22,23
Nikolaj/11
nitrit/12,5
nobilitet/12,13,4
Norge/54,11
nytilgang/7,4,12
Odysseus/11
omregne/3,22,23
ophav/12,46,6
opsamlingslejr/7,4,12
optimere/3,22,23
ottetal/12,5
overarm/7,4,12
påkære/3,22,23
Palermo/11
palet/12,9
parkvæsen/12,6,13
påske/12,13,4,32
Pedal-Ove/11
pengesum/12,9
petriskål/7,4,12
piktogram/12,5
Pius/11
pludre/3,22,23
positur/12,13,4
posthorn/12,46,6
postil/12,9
Pravda/11
profilportræt/12,5
pulsmåler/7,4,12
punke/3,22,23
pædagogik/12,9
raritetskabinet/12,5
raster/6,12,7
reaktion/12,13,4
regnearksprogram/12,5
responsaene/12,5
restere/3,22,23
Rhone/11
ringovn/7,4,12
ritualisering/12,13,4
robot/12,9,32
rodtegn/12,46,6
samfundsomstyrter/7,4,12
sammenskrabe/3,22,23
sandhedsserum/12,5,32
sangsvane/12,13,4
Sapfo/11
segl/12,46,6,32
semiotik/12,9
separatkabinet/12,5
skadestof/12,5
skanner/7,4,12,32
skilsmissebegæring/12,13,4
skive/3,22,23
skrivemaskinebord/6,12,7
skueret/12,9
skærmbræt/12,5
Slesvig-Holsten/11
slumstormer/7,4,12
smigre/3,22,23
snøft/12,46,6
socialforskningsinstitut/12,5
socialrådgivning/12,13,4
spottefugl/7,4,12
sprogæt/12,9
spække/3,22,23,32
stakit/12,5
stankelben/12,46,6
steward/12,13,4
strammer/7,4,12
strømpesok/12,9
studie/12,6,13
superfølsom/3,28
sydvestenvind/7,4,12
sæbespånevand/6,12,7
søforhør/12,46,6
tak/12,9
Tantalus/11
telefonprogram/12,5
term/12,13,4
termitbo/12,6,13
terrassehus/6,12,7
Thomas/11
tilhugge/3,22,23
Tiptronic/11
tobak/12,9
tremolo/12,6,13
trettener/7,4,12
trikotage/12,13,4,32
trænere/3,22,23
tudekopperne/12,9
udgiftsbudget/12,5
udmanøvrere/3,22,23
udskiftning/12,13,4
udsmider/7,4,12
udsyn/12,46,6
Uruk/11
validere/3,22,23
venderadien/12,9
vicepolitichef/12,13,4,32
